                              53 of 994 DOCUMENTS

               Copyright (c) 1994 Case Western Reserve University
                     Health Matrix: Journal of Law-Medicine

                                      1994

                              4 Health Matrix 325

LENGTH: 16681 words

ECONOMIC CREDENTIALING: YOUR MONEY OR YOUR LIFE!

NAME:  Brad Dallet +

BIO:



   + J.D. Candidate, Case Western Reserve University School of Law (1994).

 TEXT:
 [*325]

    The economic overhaul of health care in America is restructuring the
business of medicine, and with it the relationship between physician and
patient. Previously accustomed to thinking primarily about the best interests of
each patient, the physician now finds this traditional loyalty in conflict with
competing concerns, including those of government, business, and insurers who
watch with alarm the relentless rise in their health care expenditures. And
there are competing interests of hospitals, health maintenance organizations,
and other provider-institutions who find their survival threatened by
high-powered competition and increasingly stringent resource limits, and
interests of other physicians and their patients whose health needs compete for
limited health care dollars.  n1



    I. INTRODUCTION

    A HEART SURGEON at County Memorial Hospital recently had her hospital
privileges  n2 revoked by the hospital board. Revocation came after a routine
peer review  n3 by the hospital's medical staff. As a practicing physician at
County Memorial, this surgeon maintained a stellar success rate, her quality of
care was impeccable, her competence was unquestioned, and
 [*326]  her patients liked her. However, she had one problem: she did not
sufficiently contribute to the bottom line of the hospital.  n4 In other words,
the hospital decided that she was not making enough money for the hospital, and
for that reason alone, she is no longer permitted to admit patients there.  n5

    Due to the current rising costs of health care, the practice of medicine is
undergoing an economic overhaul.  n6 The economic difficulties which hospitals
are experiencing are evidenced by the fact that between 1980 and 1989, low
profits and high competition led to the closure of nearly 700 hospitals in this
country.  n7 These economic troubles have forced hospitals to behave more like
businesses  n8 and less like the charitable institutions they once were.  n9

    Furthermore, hospitals are being held liable for the wrongdoings that occur
within their facilities.  n10 This liability has led to the creation of the
medical staff peer review process to ensure the quality and competence of the
physicians practicing in a hospital. Through peer reviews, physicians are
reviewed based on various criteria to determine whether or not they will be
allowed privileges to admit and treat their patients in the hospital. In order
for a hospital to relieve itself of malpractice liability, it enforces these
peer review decisions to prevent incompetent physicians from obtaining
privileges.
 [*327]

    Since the primary focus of the peer review process always has been on the
quality of care, recent attempts to define a physician's qualifications for
hospital privileges based on economic factors unrelated to quality of care or
competency considerations, known as "economic credentialing," have been met with
substantial controversy.  n11 While economic credentialing considers the
financial impact a physician has on the hospital, it completely disregards the
competence, skill and quality of the physician's work. Under a policy of
economic credentialing, a physician could be excluded for treating too many poor
patients, for having privileges in a competing hospital, or for simply providing
complete and effective care. Although the hospital may have a financial
rationale for such a policy, economic credentialing ignores and interferes with
the public's interest.

    Although courts generally have upheld adverse peer review decisions based on
quality or competence concerns, whether a court would uphold a peer review
decision based solely on economic considerations is uncertain.  n12 As economic
credentialing has posed the latest threat to physicians receiving and renewing
their hospital privileges, it is sure to receive its share of litigation in the
future. These economic factors will add fuel to the fire in the already volatile
arena of physicians suing hospitals for the denial or revocation of hospital
privileges.
 [*328]

    This note argues that hospitals should not be allowed to use economic
credentialing in evaluating physicians because, by ignoring quality and
competency concerns, it goes against the grain of public policy and unreasonably
interferes with legitimate health care objectives. Furthermore, as disgruntled
physicians have challenged adverse peer review decisions with some success,
based on breach of hospital bylaws or antitrust violations, economic
credentialing will give physicians a stronger argument when attacking adverse
peer reviews on these grounds.

    Part II of this note discusses the hospital/physician relationship, explains
the peer review credentialing process, and provides a definition of economic
credentialing. Part III analyzes how hospital policies, such as economic
credentialing, have a significant impact on society and should be implemented
only in the public's interest. Finally, Part III analyzes how adverse peer
review decisions have been handled by the courts when challenged by physicians
and concludes that these challenges can be utilized to invalidate peer review
decisions that use economic credentialing.

    II. BACKGROUND

    A. The Hospital Structure

    A hospital is described as a "three-legged stool" consisting of the
administration, the governing board, and the medical staff.  n13 The hospital
administration consists of salaried employees who are responsible for the
day-to-day operations of the hospital.  n14 The hospital administration provides
"nonphysician patient care," such as nursing and operating rooms, and other
"institutional support services," such as accounting and data processing.  n15
 [*329]

    The governing board, consisting of the board of trustees and governors, has
the ultimate decision making authority in the hospital.  n16 It is important to
realize, however, that although the board has the ultimate authority it rarely
exercises it.  n17 In fact, the board typically acts as a "rubber stamp,"
usually deferring to the medical staff and approving their decisions.  n18

    The medical staff consists of the physicians who have been issued privileges
to admit their patients to the hospital for treatment.  n19 In return for these
privileges, physicians have various responsibilities to the hospital, such as
following the hospital bylaws and serving on various committees.  n20 One of the
most important of these responsibilities is participating in the peer review
process.  n21

    B. The Peer Review Process

    A physician may not simply take a patient, walk into a hospital, and begin
operating. The right of a physician to admit patients to a hospital for
treatment is known as hospital privileges.  n22 Privileges are crucial to most
physicians because physicians need the beds, equipment, staff, and supplies of a
hospital in order to effectively treat their patients.  n23 The process by which
the hospital determines which physicians will receive these privileges is known
as credentialing or peer review.  n24

    During physician credentialing, the members of the committee must decide
whether to issue or renew hospital privileges
 [*330]  to the physician under review.  n25 This decision is based on a variety
of factors such as the physician's competence, ability, experience and judgment.
n26 Any physician who is applying for privileges for the first time to a
particular hospital will undergo such a review.  n27 Furthermore, hospitals will
submit physicians currently holding privileges to the same review in order to
assure that all their physicians are competent and are providing high quality
care.  n28 Although the board has the final word on any credentialing decision,
most often they defer to the medical staff's decision.  n29 The board's
responsibilities to the credentialing of physicians, as well as other
responsibilities, are illustrated in statutes  n30 and common law,  n31 as well
as the accreditation regulations of the Joint Commission on Accreditation of
Healthcare Organizations ("JCAHO").  n32
 [*331]

    The result of the peer review may be a positive one; the physician under
review may obtain new privileges or have existing privileges renewed. On the
other hand, the decision may be an adverse one; the physician may be denied new
privileges or have existing privileges revoked. As would be expected, those
disgruntled physicians who receive adverse peer reviews turn to the courts for
redress. The following sections will discuss the rationale for the peer review
system and how peer reviews have been implemented.

    1. The Development of The Medical Staff Peer Review Process

    Today's system of medical staff peer review has evolved as the relationships
between physicians and hospitals have changed.  n33 In the early twentieth
century, hospitals were almshouses for the poor while wealthier patients were
treated by private physicians in the comfort of their homes.  n34 However, with
the growing concept of surgery in hospitals, physicians' interest in gaining
access to these hospitals also grew.  n35

    Momentum for hospital reform came about in the early part of the 20th
century with the development of state medical boards of licensure and improved
medical education.  n36 After a survey from the American College of Surgeons
("ACS")  n37 revealed substantial deficiencies in hospitals, the ACS established
a set of national standards for hospital accreditation.  n38 The ACS required
that physicians affiliated with hospitals must organize into a medical staff
n39 and that "medical staff member  [*332]  ship must be restricted to doctors
competent in their fields and worthy in character."  n40

    In 1952, the Joint Commission on Accreditation of Hospitals was created
collectively by the ACS, the American Medical Association, and others. After
initially adopting the standards created by the ACS,  n41 JCAHO eventually
expanded the requirements for medical staff peer review that were necessary for
hospital accreditation.  n42 As JCAHO has refined its standards over time, it
has dominated the shaping of hospital medical staffs and the development of
physician credentialing requirements.  n43

    2. The Implementation of The Peer Review Process

    Several rationales have been proposed for the development of the peer review
process. Some take a paternalistic view, asserting that "since the medical field
is so specialized, only physicians can protect patients from poor-quality
medical care."  n44 Others believe that the medical staff functions like
Consumer Reports, providing necessary consumer information to the patients.  n45
Medical staff reviews also are seen as a means to control the utilization of
medical services while internally monitoring the quality of care.  n46 Whatever
the rationale, the peer review process has been adopted as the process through
which accredited hospitals issue and renew privileges to physicians. Indeed,
common law, federal statutes, state statutes,
 [*333]  JCAHO regulations, and medical staff bylaws all have a hand in the
implementation of the peer review process. Common Law: At one time, the
perception was that hospitals did not act through their physicians, but rather
that they procured physicians who were responsible for their own actions.  n47
Under this view, the hospitals were not legally responsible for their
physicians' torts. However, in the landmark ruling of Darling v. Charlestown
Community Hospital,  n48 the Supreme Court of Illinois established that a
hospital may be held independently liable for negligently failing to monitor the
quality and competence of the physicians on its staff.  n49 The Darling court
stated,

    Certainly the person who avails himself of 'hospital facilities' expects
that the hospital will attempt to cure him, not that the nurses or other
employees will act on their own responsibility. The Standards for Hospital
Accreditation, the state licensing regulations and the [hospital's] bylaws
demonstrate that the medical profession and other responsible authorities regard
it as both desirable and feasible that a hospital assume certain
responsibilities for the care of the patients.  n50



    It was at this juncture that the common law first recognized that hospitals
could be held responsible for torts under a theory of corporate liability.

    Similarly, in Johnson v. Misericordia Community Hospital  n51 the Supreme
Court of Wisconsin further defined the hospital's duty. In Johnson, the court
held that "a hospital owes a duty to its patients to exercise reasonable care in
the selection of its medical staff and in granting specialized privileges."  n52
Here, the court specifically stated that this is to be accomplished via the peer
review process by investigating the physician's competence, education, training,
experience, adverse malpractice actions, and by determining whether the
physician
 [*334]  has lost privileges in any other hospital.  n53 Therefore, the Johnson
court made it clear that the objective of the peer review is to insure a high
quality of care in the hospital and failure to use the peer review process to
insure such quality may result in liability to the hospital.  n54 Federal
Statute: In attempting to deal with the medical malpractice crisis, Congress
enacted the Health Care Quality Improvement Act of 1986 ("HCQIA").  n55 The Act
establishes a two part program by which the medical profession can rid itself of
unsatisfactory physicians by: (1) providing limited immunity from legal
liability for physicians who engage in good-faith peer review activity  n56 and
(2) establishing a national data bank for reporting physicians' acts of
incompetence and malpractice.  n57

    Although Congress stated that the peer review system is critical in solving
the medical malpractice crisis,  n58 it realized that the peer review system
could be used as a ploy to eliminate the competition of perfectly good
physicians.  n59 Courts and commentators have grappled with this dilemma in
attempting to distinguish good faith peer reviewers from those who are oper
[*335]  ating in their own economic best interests.  n60 The HCQIA is Congress'
attempt to improve the quality of medical care by encouraging and protecting the
proper use of the peer review system.  n61

    The HCQIA grants antitrust immunity to physicians who participate in
good-faith peer review attempts to weed out incompetent physicians.  n62
Congress specifically stated that immunity will be provided to physicians who
participate in peer review activity based on "the competence or professional
conduct of an individual physician (which conduct affects or could affect
adversely the health or welfare of a patient or patients)."  n63 Congress
specifically excluded immunity for "any other matter that does not relate to the
competence or professional conduct of a physician."  n64 Therefore, in enacting
the HCQIA, Congress was anticipating that the peer review process would be
implemented effectively for maintaining quality health care and competent
physicians.  n65
 [*336]  State Statutes: While most state statutes institute requirements for
the hospital peer review process,  n66 there is a split as to the specificity of
the requirements. Some statutes only serve as a broad framework in which
hospitals should implement the peer review process.  n67 For example, Illinois
law allows generally flexible credentialing requirements that are consistent
with the institution's objectives.  n68 On the other hand, some states have more
detailed requirements.  n69 For example, Maryland law considers that the
credentialing process reviews the physician's education, clinical expertise,
licensure history, medical history,
 [*337]  claims history and professional experience.  n70 However, regardless of
specificity, states tend to require that the peer review process be based upon
some notions of quality and competence. JCAHO Regulations: The standards of the
Joint Commission on Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations ("JCAHO") for the
peer review process are very specific.  n71 For example, they state that
although the governing board has the final authority on credentialing decisions,
the actual decisionmaking function is conducted by the medical staff.  n72
Furthermore, JCAHO requires that the medical staff maintain a set of bylaws that
includes their rules for self governance.  n73 JCAHO also mandates that each
staff member is to have privileges appointed to him or her  n74 and that these
privileges are to be awarded via a specific peer review process as included in
the bylaws.  n75 Finally, JCAHO requires that physicians have their privileges
reviewed every two years by this peer review process.  n76 Although these
standards are of a voluntary organization, arguably they have
 [*338]  the force of law.  n77 Thus, JCAHO requirements have greatly affected
the way hospitals run their peer review systems.  n78 Medical Staff Bylaws: Like
the JCAHO regulations, state law also requires the bylaws to include the rules
for the peer review process.  n79 Since medical staff bylaws constitute a
contract between the medical staff and the hospital, both parties must follow
the peer review rules and neither side unilaterally can change them.  n80
Therefore, the bylaws will force the medical staff to abide by the rules in
carrying out physician peer reviews.

    In summary, the state and federal laws, in addition to the JCAHO
regulations, set the standards for which hospital peer review will be
implemented. These rules and regulations are given life through the hospital and
medical staff bylaws. As evidenced by these rules, the chief factor of
evaluation under the peer review system is quality of care. Since the bylaws are
seen as a contract that cannot be unilaterally altered, an attempt to change the
criteria of the peer review would prove difficult.

    C. Economic Credentialing Defined

    As noted above, the peer review credentialing process evaluates physicians
based on quality and competence factors to ensure that the highest level of care
is being provided in the
 [*339]  hospitals.  n81 However, when the hospital reviews a physician and
bases its privileging decision upon economic factors  n82 rather than the
preferred quality and competency criteria, the hospital is using economic
credentialing. The two key elements necessary to identify economic credentialing
are: (1) a physician under review is only judged by economic criteria; and (2)
this economic criteria is the only factor directly tied to the decision of
whether or not to issue or renew the physician's privileges.  n83 Economic
credentialing "has nothing to do with professional quality and competence."  n84

    For a better understanding, the following are three illustrations of
economic credentialing in action. Although these illustrations may seem
different, all three are examples of economic credentialing being applied to
prevent a physician from obtaining privileges in a particular hospital.
 [*340]

    1. Economic Credentialing to Maximize DRG Payments

    With the current prospective payment system for reimbursement of hospital
services (based on a system of Diagnosis Related Groups, or "DRGs"), physicians
and hospitals are faced with competing incentives for providing health care.
Under the DRG system, the hospital is reimbursed a set fee for each patient
admitted -- each patient being entitled to one diagnosis.  n85 The diagnosis is
determined after the patient is treated and released from the hospital, thus
with the benefit of 20/20 hindsight.  n86 Regardless of how expensive the
patient was to treat or how long the patient spent in the hospital, the hospital
receives only the fixed DRG payment.  n87 Therefore, hospitals have an incentive
to keep costs down.

    As hospitals are attempting to keep expenses down for each diagnosed
patient, physicians are operating under competing incentives. The physicians are
responsible for diagnosing patients, ordering tests, and performing the medical
procedures.  n88 Furthermore, physicians are reimbursed a set fee for each
procedure performed and are under a perpetual threat of malpractice litigation
should he/she negligently fail to perform a procedure or test.  n89 Therefore,
when in doubt, the physician has an incentive to perform the extra test or
procedure. This incentive is clearly opposite the hospital's incentive to keep
expenses down. As hospitals want to treat the patient with minimal resources and
send him home, physicians want to treat the patient as effectively and
completely as possible.  n90 Hospitals
 [*341]  use economic credentialing to force physicians to concentrate on
lowering the expense of health care and improving profit margins.  n91

    2. Economic Credentialing to Avoid Competition

    In Rosenblum v. Tallahassee Memorial Regional Medical Center,  n92 the only
economic credentialing case tried to date, Tallahassee Memorial Regional Medical
Center  n93 ("TMRMC") denied Dr. Rosenblum privileges to its cardiac department
solely because he had a contract with a competing hospital, Tallahassee
Community Hospital ("TCH").  n94 Because of Dr. Rosenblum's contract with TCH to
establish and run its cardiac surgery unit, TMRMC concluded that he would
represent a business liability to their hospital.  n95 Although TMRMC admitted
that Dr. Rosenblum is a "reputable surgeon with superior skills" and that his
qualifications were never an issue,  n96 they denied him privileges.  n97
Rosenblum is a clear
 [*342]  case of a hospital using economic credentialing to avoid competition.

    3. Economic Credentialing to Ensure More Profitable Patient Mix

    Under economic credentialing, physicians who do not have what the hospital
considers a "profitable patient mix"  n98 may be in danger of losing their
privileges.  n99 For example, since a hospital is reimbursed for less than its
actual expenses for treating Medicaid patients,  n100 hospital's tend not to
look favorably on physicians with a large Medicaid practice.  n101 The
percentage of Medicaid patients or charity care a physician provides are factors
wholly unrelated to competence or quality of care.  n102 Therefore, when a
hospital decides against privileges to a physician based on patient mix, the
hospital is using economic credentialing.  n103

    From the above illustrations, it should be clear that economic credentialing
arises in different ways. However, in every application, economic credentialing
ties a physician's privileges directly to his or her economic performance for
the hospital, while ignoring all other criteria. Economic credentialing is
receiving increased attention in the 1990's.  n104 In some instances,
 [*343]  hospitals are so divided on the issue that physicians are leaving their
hospitals.  n105 In other instances, state medical societies are taking a stand
against such policies.  n106 However, the question remains: will hospitals be
permitted to exclude or expel physicians based solely on economic
considerations?

    III. CHALLENGES TO ECONOMIC CREDENTIALING

    Society and individual physicians are both directly affected by medical
staff peer reviews. As people place themselves in a physician's care with the
hope of being cured, they rely on the hospital to ensure a competent and
skillful medical staff. Since society has a vested interest in the competency
and quality of their treating physicians, hospitals should consider these
interests when creating a policy that determines on what criteria a physician
will be reviewed for privileges. In addition, if the hospital policy violates
the medical staff bylaws (considered a contract between the physician and the
hospital) or the federal antitrust laws (prohibiting unfair competition), legal
challenges may be brought to invalidate such policies.

    Since hospitals that use economic credentialing are not concerned with
quality or competence issues, such a policy should be considered against public
policy. Furthermore, unless economic criteria is provided in the bylaws as a
possible sole criteria for evaluating physicians, economic credentialing would
constitute a breach of contract by the hospital. Finally, since economic
credentialing is not protected from antitrust scrutiny, such a policy may
violate the federal antitrust laws.

    A. The Public Policy Challenge

    Imagine this: You are sitting in a hospital waiting room, before undergoing
a major surgical operation, reading the latest edition of Newsweek. While
flipping through the magazine,
 [*344]  you courageously scan an article regarding hospital care. In the
article, a physician is quoted as saying, "you learn the tricks, learn the
shortcuts, then hope you don't do anything wrong."  n107 Reading further, you
learn that this physician has been told that unless he becomes more profitable
to the hospital, he will lose his admitting privileges.  n108

    With the rising costs of health care, hospitals are in a situation where, in
adopting policies, they must balance their private management objectives with
those of public interest.  n109 In order for a hospital to maintain a policy
that furthers its management objectives, the policy also should further the
public's interests and certainly not interfere with that interest.  n110
However, if a policy does not further any public health care objective, or
unreasonably interferes with legitimate public health care objectives, such a
policy should be invalidated as against the public good.

    1. Hospital Policy For a Public Health Care Objective

    Hospitals are responsible for operating for the good of the public -- not in
their own private best interests.  n111 In light of this premise, the
reasonableness of hospital policy should be based on how the public health may
be affected by the particular policy.  n112 For example, in Redding v. St.
Francis Medical
 [*345]  Center,  n113 the California Court of Appeals affirmed the trial
court's finding that the hospital's decision to maintain a closedstaff policy
was in the interest of "improving patient care, and . . . reducing mortality
rates."  n114 In that case, the court determined that the hospital policy
decision was reasonable, even though it prevented independent physicians from
acquiring privileges, because it furthered the public health care objectives of
improving patient care and reducing mortality rates.  n115

    However, in Desai v. St. Barnabas Medical Center,  n116 the New Jersey
Supreme Court in determining the reasonableness of hospital policy reached the
opposite conclusion. In Desai, the hospital adopted a closed-staff policy of
issuing privileges to applying physicians.  n117 The policy, however, had six
exceptions -most importantly allowing privileges to an applying physician who
was "joining the medical practice of a current member of the hospital medical
staff."  n118 The court recognized that such a discriminatory policy only could
be upheld if it advanced a public health objective.  n119 The court concluded
that since it only benefitted those staff members who already were admitted and
was not in furtherance of the public interest, the exception was unreasonable.
n120

    When making staffing decisions, the hospital must consider not only public
health objectives, but also the interests of the hospital management. Hospitals
are given great discretion in their decisions, but only "to the extent that they
exert their efforts toward the elevation of hospital standards and higher
medical care."  n121 Therefore, in assessing hospital expenses and
quality-of-care concerns, hospitals always should remember
 [*346]  that "their existence is for the purpose of faithfully furnishing
facilities to the members of the medical profession in aid of their service to
the public."  n122

    Hospitals have grappled with creating reasonable credentialing policies that
further both the interests of the public and the interests of hospital
management.  n123 Since credentialing policies have such a broad impact on the
public welfare, hospitals should be required to adequately support the
reasonableness of their policy.  n124 Hospitals should support such policies
with information that "adequately demonstrates that a genuine health care
objective is reasonably and rationally served" by the policy.  n125 Without
"persuasive information" proving that the hospital needs such a policy to
improve patient care, such a policy should not be said to reasonably and
rationally advance a legitimate health care objective.  n126

    2. Economic Credentialing As Hospital Policy

    Since economic credentialing is a form of hospital policy, to be considered
reasonable it also should further a legitimate health care objective necessary
to improve the quality of care.  n127 However, since economic credentialing
"defines an individual's qualification . . . based on economic factors unrelated
to quality-of-care or competency considerations,"  n128 such
 [*347]  a policy should not be considered reasonably and rationally in
furtherance of a legitimate health care objective. With economic credentialing,
hospitals place the interests of managing the hospital before the interests of
the public -- usually not even considering the interests of the public.  n129
Such a policy not only has no legitimate public health care objective, it also
unreasonably interferes with several legitimate health care objectives.

    Access to Health Care: Most importantly, economic credentialing interferes
with the public's access to health care. Since physicians only may treat
patients in hospitals where they have privileges, denying privileges effectively
denies patients access to health care. For example, a hospital may not look
favorably upon a physician who has a large Medicaid practice, since Medicaid
typically reimburses the hospital less than Medicare or privately insured
patients.  n130 If that hospital maintains a policy of economic credentialing,
it would be able to revoke that physician's privileges, forcing his/her patients
to obtain health care elsewhere. This may not be a problem if the physician has
privileges in another nearby hospital; however, if the physician has privileges
in a far away hospital or in no other hospital at all, these patients will be
denied the ability to select their desired physician-hospital combination.  n131
Denial of such access
 [*348]  would not be considered acting for the public good.  n132

    A policy restricting access might be considered reasonable if it furthers
quality or competency concerns;  n133 however, economic credentialing removes
these issues from consideration, effectively eliminating any inference of
reasonableness. Since economic credentialing would allow a hospital to exclude a
physician without any legitimate health care reason while limiting patients'
access to health care, such a policy unreasonably would interfere with the
public health care objective of access to health care.

    Higher Quality Health Care: Economic credentialing also interferes with the
public health care objective of higher quality health care. Indeed, one of the
main goals of the HCQIA was to increase the quality of health care by
effectively removing incompetent physicians who provided a low level of care.
n134 Congress was so concerned about removing incompetent physicians that it
legally protected good-faith peer reviews which were based on competence or
quality concerns.  n135 However, under economic credentialing, the focus of
credentialing turns away from quality and competence, to concerns of economics
and profits. Congress specifically refrained from extending legal protection to
peer reviews that were not based on quality or competence concerns because "such
protection might be abused and serve as a shield for anti-competitive economic
actions under the guise of quality controls."  n136 Thus, Congress determined
that protecting such credentialing would interfere unreasonably with the public
objective of higher quality health care. Since economic credentialing, by
definition, is devoid of quality
 [*349]  or competence concerns, such a policy unreasonably interferes with this
public health care objective.

    Reduce Malpractice and Health Care Costs: Finally, in adopting an economic
credentialing policy, hospitals unreasonably interfere with the public health
care objective of reducing malpractice and health care costs.  n137 As already
discussed, hospitals have an incentive to minimize resources and expenses for
each admitted patient.  n138 Physicians, on the other hand, have an incentive to
provide the best and most complete care possible to cure their patients and
avoid malpractice.  n139 Under a policy of economic credentialing, physicians
will be forced to find shortcuts to keep their costs down in order to retain
their hospital privileges.  n140 However, if physicians become more concerned
with the cost of an additional test rather than the potential good the test may
do for the patient,  n141 clearly the quality of care would decline, increasing
the likelihood of malpractice litigation and the overall cost of health care.
n142 As the public has legitimate health care objectives to increase the quality
of care while reducing malpractice litigation and the overall cost of health
care, a policy of economic credentialing unreasonably interferes with these
objectives.

    Although hospitals may have a rationale for implementing economic
credentialing policies, such policies simply do not further any public health
care objective. And while hospitals may be given great deference in adopting
their policies, such discretion is not boundless.  n143 Unless the hospital's
policy is reasonably and rationally in furtherance of a public health care
objective, the policy should be held invalid as being against the public good.
n144 Since economic credentialing not only does not
 [*350]  further the public interest but also unreasonably interferes with
legitimate public health care objectives, such a policy should be held invalid
as being against the public good.

    B. The Breach of Bylaws Challenge

    As mandated by JCAHO and many state statutes, the rules for the peer review
process must be incorporated into the medical staff bylaws.  n145 Therefore,
when a physician receives an adverse peer review decision, he or she may attempt
to challenge the decision as not following the rules set up in the bylaws.  n146
The issues then become the extent of the legal significance of the medical staff
bylaws and upon what grounds a physician can substantiate a challenge.

    Of all the challenges brought by physicians against peer review decisions,
breach of bylaws has been recognized most widely as a challenge that will
overturn a peer review decision because the courts and JCAHO have determined
that medical staff bylaws constitute a binding contract between the hospital and
the medical staff physicians.  n147 For example, in Spencer v. Community
Hospital of Evanston,  n148 the court stated that when a physician's privileges
are revoked or reduced the hospital must follow its bylaws in the
decision-making process.  n149 And more recently, in Alfredson v. Lewisburg
Community Hospital,  n150 the court indicated that the medical staff bylaws must
be followed as "a hospital's bylaws are an integral part of its contractual
relationship with the members of its medical staff."  n151 Furthermore, some
courts have ruled that, in addition
 [*351]  to creating a contractual obligation, hospital bylaws must be followed
as a matter of public policy.  n152

    As discussed above, JCAHO specifically mandates that hospitals have bylaws
that incorporate the rules of self governance and that those bylaws are a
binding contract that neither party unilaterally may amend.  n153 Therefore,
JCAHO is consistent with the courts' decisions that hospital bylaws must be
upheld as legally binding contracts that cannot be altered unilaterally. Since
these bylaws are considered a binding contract between the physicians and the
hospital and required to include the rules for credentialing, a violation of the
rules would lead to a breach of contract claim. Therefore, in order to avoid a
breach of contract suit, these credentialing rules must be followed.

    Since its inception, peer review credentialing has been used as a mechanism
to keep out incompetent and poor quality physicians.  n154 However, as hospitals
are now considering the use of economic criteria in the decision-making process,
the bylaws must be inspected to find approval for the use of such criteria.
Since current bylaws reflect the original intent of the peer review process
(that is quality and competence concerns), finding such approval in the bylaws
may prove difficult. It would be especially difficult to find approval for
basing a credentialing decision solely upon economic criteria while ignoring all
quality and competence concerns. In order to receive such approval, medical
staff bylaws would have to be amended to include economic criteria. A special
provision must be implemented into the bylaws to uphold a decision based solely
upon economic considerations. Would a hospital attempt to unilaterally amend the
bylaws? If it did, it would not only run up against an array of legal precedent
but also the JCAHO regu  [*352]  lations that specifically forbid such an act.
Since medical staff bylaws cannot be unilaterally amended, such an alteration
would require not only the approval of the governing board, but the approval of
the medical staff as well. However, attempting to convince a medical staff to
agree with such amendments will be an arduous task. "Attempts by hospitals to
impose a system of economic credentialing will cause enormous stresses and
strains on an already tenuous relationship between medical staffs and hospital
boards."  n155 Physicians will not approve of amending hospital bylaws to
provide for economic credentialing because such factors are not in the best
interest of their patients or themselves.  n156 If the medical staff will not
support such amendments, economic credentialing will be prevented from being
introduced to hospital bylaws, effectively providing physicians with a legal
challenge to any such decision.

    However, some courts may interpret a hospital's bylaws as already allowing
economic credentialing with such phrases as "in pursuit of institutional
objectives" or "any other relevant factors." Even though these phrases allow the
use of economic factors in the decisionmaking process, they really amount to the
permissible use of utilization review.  n157 Since economic credentialing is
distinct from utilization review,  n158 such inclusive language in hospital
bylaws will not permit the exclusive use of economic criteria in the peer-review
process. Without a specific provision in the medical staff bylaws allowing for
the use of economic credentialing, such a policy will constitute a breach of the
hospital's contractual obligation.
 [*353]

    C. The Antitrust Challenge

    Federal antitrust laws are considered "fully applicable in the context of
the health care industry."  n159 Therefore, with the possibility of treble
damages, federal antitrust challenges have "posed the biggest threat" of all the
challenges brought by physicians in peer review litigation.  n160

    Although sometimes with considerable skepticism,  n161 the courts have
continued to entertain antitrust challenges to peer review decisions because
"abuse of the peer-review process is not just hypothetically possible but has
been found to have occurred in a small but significant number of cases."  n162

    The goal of the federal antitrust laws is to preserve competition in the
marketplace by forbidding certain anti-competitive conduct. In particular,
Section 1 of the Sherman Act  n163 renders unlawful "every contract, combination
in the form of trust or otherwise, or conspiracy, in restraint of trade."  n164
Since by definition, peer review activity involves a form of concerted activity,
peer review decisions have great potential for antitrust vio  [*354]  lations.
n165 In order to prevail in a Section 1 action against peer review activity,
three elements must be proven. First, the physician must prove the peer review
affects interstate commerce. Second, the physician must prove the peer review
decision was made by a contract, combination or conspiracy. Finally, the
physician must prove the peer review decision produced an adverse and
anticompetitive effect on competition.

    1. Affecting Interstate Commerce

    To analyze a peer review decision under the Sherman Act, it must first be
determined whether or not the conduct (the peer-review activity) is in or
substantially affects interstate commerce.  n166 This had been seen as a
jurisdictional "stumbling block" to physicians who could not show that the peer
review decision had such an effect.  n167 To get over this jurisdictional hump,
the physician had to identify, with evidence beyond the pleadings, the relevant
part of interstate commerce affected.  n168

    However, in Summit Health, Ltd. v. Pinhas,  n169 the Supreme Court made this
jurisdictional requirement easier to meet. In Pinhas, an ophthalmologist with
privileges in a Los Angeles hospital alleged a conspiracy between the hospital
and its staff to revoke his hospital privileges.  n170 In alleging a violation
of Section 1 of the Sherman Act, Dr. Pinhas asserted that excluding his services
from the hospital had the required effect on interstate commerce to give the
court federal jurisdiction.  n171 The Court held that since ophthalmological
services are "regularly performed for out-of-state patients and generate
revenues from out-of-state sources,"  n172 their exclusion would have "a
sufficient nexus with interstate commerce to support federal jurisdiction."
n173 Since almost all hospital physicians treat out-of  [*355]  state patients
and receive out-of-state revenue, the Pinhas decision effectively allows
physicians excluded from health care entities as a result of the peer-review
process to almost always satisfy the jurisdictional requirement of affecting
interstate commerce.  n174

    2. Contract, Combination or Conspiracy

    Since Section 1 of the Sherman Act does not wholly forbid unilateral
conduct, the physician must prove that two or more distinct entities agreed to
take action against him.  n175 However, officers or employees of corporations or
divisions of corporations do not provide this required plurality.  n176
Therefore, in order for a physician to successfully sustain a Section 1
challenge against an adverse peer-review decision, it must be determined that
the medical staff has the capacity to perform such a concerted activity.

    The prevailing rule is established in Weiss v. York Hospital.  n177 In
Weiss, the court described the medical staff as:

    a group of doctors, all of whom practice medicine in their individual
capacities, and each of whom is an independent economic entity in competition
with other doctors in the . . . medical community. Each staff member, therefore,
has an economic interest separate from and in many cases in competition with the
interests of other medical staff members. Under
 [*356]  these circumstances, the medical staff cannot be considered a single
economic entity for the purposes of antitrust analysis.  n178



    Therefore, the Weiss court concluded that the medical staff's actions (which
would include peer review decisions) should be viewed as "actions of a
combination of the individual doctors who make it up."  n179 As Weiss and other
courts have noted,  n180 the medical staff of a hospital has the capacity to
conspire amongst itself, therefore, creating a concerted activity susceptible to
antitrust scrutiny. Furthermore, by definition, a peer review is a collective
decision of the medical staff members on the peer review committee. Therefore,
every peer review decision of the hospital medical staff has the potential for
an antitrust violation.

    3. Producing Adverse and Anti-Competitive Effects

    Once the physician has proven a conspiracy among the medical staff, it must
be further proven that the concerted action caused an unreasonable restraint of
trade.  n181 Although all commercial agreements may be said to somewhat restrain
trade, only unreasonable restraints violate Section 1.  n182 Judging the
reasonableness of the restraint depends upon "its impact on competition as a
whole within the relevant market."  n183 The courts have used two approaches in
assessing the reasonableness of such restraints: illegal per se and the rule of
reason.

    Illegal Per Se: A court will hold conduct illegal per se when the concerted
activity has a "pernicious effect on competition and lacks . . . any redeeming
virtue."  n184 Such agreements
 [*357]  are said to be so manifestly anticompetitive in nature that they can be
deemed illegal without close evaluation.  n185 However, the lines between the
per se rule and the rule of reason have been blurred as courts have overruled
previous per se cases and refused to expand the categories of cases subject to
the per se analysis.  n186 Furthermore, courts have "been slow to condemn rules
adopted by professional associations as unreasonable per se."  n187

    Rule of Reason: Under the rule of reason analysis, the test of legality is
"whether the restraint imposed is such as merely regulates and perhaps thereby
promotes competition or whether it is such as may suppress or even destroy
competition."  n188 This entails an analysis of "the facts peculiar to the
business, the history of the restraint, and the reasons why it was imposed."
n189 Furthermore, the restraint must be proven to have the potential to produce
"adverse, anticompetitive effects within relevant product and geographical
markets."  n190

    Which Approach to Use? Under the per se rule, "anticompetitive purposes and
anticompetitive effect are conclusively presumed to exist once the forbidden
conduct is proven, so that proof of the forbidden conduct is by itself proof of
an antitrust
 [*358]  violation."  n191 Such an approach would be inappropriate in evaluating
peer review decisions. The conduct being analyzed in credentialing cases is the
peer review decision of the medical staff. Under the per se rule, every
challenged peer review decision would have to be held invalid because that
conduct would be considered "unlawful in and of itself, without regard to the
effect of the conduct or the purpose of those engaging in it."  n192 Since the
peer review process is not so "inherently anticompetitive" this approach would
not be appropriate for determining anticompetitiveness.  n193

    Since the per se rule is inappropriate in evaluating the anticompetitiveness
of peer reviews, a rule of reason approach should be used. The rule of reason
approach is better suited to this evaluation because under this rule, "the
anticompetitive purpose or effect of the conduct" must be proven.  n194 Since a
peer review very often has no anticompetitive purpose, this case by case
approach will eliminate more accurately only the anticompetitive peer reviews.
n195 Therefore, in order for a physician to prove that an adverse peer review
decision violated Section 1, he must prove that the decision unreasonably
restrained trade by having an anticompetitive effect within the relevant market.
n196
 [*359]

    As mentioned above, Section 1 violations have been proven in several cases.
n197 The Supreme Court in Patrick v. Burget  n198 affirmed the circuit court's
decision that Oregon physicians violated the Sherman Act when they improperly
participated in peer review activity, resulting in the loss of Dr. Patrick's
hospital privileges.  n199 The events of this case occurred in Astoria, Oregon,
a town with a population of 10,000  n200 and with one hospital and one private
clinic.  n201 Patrick, who had privileges in the hospital as a general and
vascular surgeon, declined an offer to become a partner in the private clinic
and instead set up a private practice to compete with the clinic.  n202
Physicians of the clinic initiated and participated in a peer review evaluation
of Patrick, which resulted in the loss of his privileges at the community's one
hospital.  n203

    Patrick illustrates a classic example of a medical staff unreasonably
restraining trade by having an anticompetitive effect within the relevant
market. Since there was only one hospital in the area, the relevant market was
established.  n204 Furthermore, since the restraint on trade was contrary to the
legitimate purpose of the peer review process and had no procompetitive effects,
such evidence was sufficient to determine concerted activity in violation of
Section 1.

    4. Immunity To Antitrust Liability

    The Patrick decision also illustrates that the state-action doctrine  n205
of antitrust immunity will not protect peer review
 [*360]  activity.  n206 The Court recognized that "effective peer review is
essential to the provision of quality medical care" and the possible "chilling
effect" that could fall upon peer review if immunity is not granted.  n207
However, the Court concluded that unless Congress grants such immunity by law,
the only stateaction immunity that would be granted is where "the State
effectively has made this conduct its own."  n208

    Following Patrick, Congress provided limited antitrust immunity for
participants in medical staff peer reviews in the Health Care Quality
Improvement Act of 1986 ("HCQIA").  n209 The HCQIA is Congress's way of
"accurately and expeditiously distinguishing . . . legitimate peer review
activity" (that which is intended to improve the quality of care) from abusive
peer review activity.  n210 Therefore, in order to qualify for protection, the
peer reviewers must base their decision on "the competence or professional
conduct of an individual physician (which conduct affects or could affect
adversely the health or welfare of a patient or patients)."  n211

    In furthering its efforts to protect only good-faith peer reviews, the
drafters of the HCQIA specifically stated instances that would not be considered
based on competence or professional conduct. This list includes decisions based
on whether or not a physician joined a professional society, the fees or
advertising of the physician, the economic organization of the medical practice,
or the physician's activities with other health care professionals.  n212 Since
this list is not intended to be complete,
 [*361]  the Act states that immunity is excluded for "any other matter that
does not relate to the competence or professional conduct of a physician."  n213
Therefore, the above provisions conclusively support Congress' intent that
medical staff peer review is to be used legitimately to "improve the quality of
medical care in this country by encouraging the medical profession to rid itself
of bad doctors."  n214

    5. Another Obstacle For Economic Credentialing

    If an adverse peer review decision were based solely upon economic criteria,
a stronger antitrust case may be brought by a disgruntled physician.  n215
First, economic credentialing would not fall under the protection of the HCQIA
immunity provisions, because basing a credentialing decision solely upon
economic considerations does not relate to the competence or professional
conduct of a physician. As noted above, if a physician was affected adversely by
a peer review decision because he served poor patients, because he was an
economic threat to other physicians or because of some sort of "turf battle,"
the reviewers would not receive immunity.  n216

    Furthermore, from the discussions noted in the Congressional and House
Reports, it is evident that this immunity is to be construed narrowly. The main
purpose of this immunity is to "improve the quality of medical care in this
country by encouraging the medical profession to rid itself of bad doctors."
n217 Therefore, unless the economic criteria was somehow evidence of quality
concerns, the protection would not be provided.  n218 Certainly, in a case of
economic credentialing, where economics were the sole criteria, such immunity
would be inappropriate.
 [*362]

    Since antitrust immunity would not be available for economic credentialing,
participants in such peer review decisions would be subject to the federal
antitrust laws. As discussed above, challenges to peer reviews are said to have
met the jurisdictional requirement.  n219 Furthermore, the hospital medical
staff is considered to have the capacity to conspire.  n220 Additionally,
situations arise where the restraint on trade, via the peer review decision, is
within the relevant market.  n221 Therefore, if the restraint is unreasonable
and not pro-competitive, the peer review decision will violate Section 1 of the
Sherman Act.

    Economic credentialing can be an unreasonable and anticompetitive restraint
of trade.  n222 Under a rule of reason analysis, the court must consider the
reasons why the adverse peer review decision was imposed.  n223 If the reasons
are legitimate, that would evidence a reasonable restraint of trade. However, in
light of the lengthy discussions revolving around the HCQIA immunity provisions,
a peer review based solely on economic considerations may be an inappropriate
abuse of the peer review system. In a case such as Patrick, where there is only
one hospital, such a restraint significantly would reduce competition and might
affect drastically the quality and availability of care to the public. The fact
that a peer review decision was based solely on economic considerations would be
additional evidence that the restraint was unreasonable and anti-competitive.
Therefore, economic credentialing may enhance an already plausible antitrust
challenge of an adverse peer review decision.  n224
 [*363]

    IV. CONCLUSION

    The main goal of the peer review process is to provide patients with top
quality care by competent physicians. As introduced by the common law of
hospital corporate liability and further supported by JCAHO, as inscribed in
hospital bylaws and as protected by the HCQIA, the peer review system
effectively functions to rid the medical field of incompetent physicians. As
stated in such laws and policies, peer review decisions are to be evaluated
based on competence and quality concerns.

    Economic credentialing substitutes economic criteria for the required
quality concerns. The result is that a physician may be denied privileges or
have existing privileges revoked based solely upon economic criteria regardless
of the physician's competency and regardless of the impact on society. Such peer
review decisions do not serve the public's interest and run afoul of statutory
law, common law and hospital bylaws. Notwithstanding the hospital's concern for
its bottom line, society cannot tolerate the effects of economic credentialing.
Hospitals always must remember that they exist to serve the public's interest,
not their own private interests.

Legal Topics:

For related research and practice materials, see the following legal topics:
Healthcare LawBusiness Administration & OrganizationAccreditationHealthcare
LawBusiness Administration & OrganizationHospital PrivilegesProfessional
ReviewHealthcare LawBusiness Administration & OrganizationPeer ReviewStatutes

FOOTNOTES:




n1  E. Haavi Morreim, Economic Disclosure And Economic Advocacy: New Duties in
The Medical Standard of Care, 12 J. LEGAL MED. 275, 275 (1991).




n2  Hospital privileges (also known as clinical privileges) are defined as
"permission to provide medical or other patient care services in the granting
institution, within welldefined limits, based on the individual's professional
license and his/her experience, competence, ability, and judgment." Joint Comm'n
on Accreditation of Healthcare Orgs., THE ACCREDITATION MANUAL FOR HOSPITALS 53
(1993) [hereinafter JCAHO MANUAL]. Physicians must have such privileges in order
to use the beds, equipment and support staff within the facility. Id.




n3  Peer review (also known as credentialing) is where "the organization
establishes hospital-specific mechanisms for the appointment and reappointment
of medical staff members and the granting and renewal/revision of clinical
privileges." Id.




n4  There are a number of ways a physician negatively may affect the bottom
line. Her procedures may cost more than the Diagnostic Related Group ("DRG")
payment will reimburse, she may have many Medicaid patients who typically are
not as profitable as other patients, or she may be competing with the particular
hospital by also treating patients at another hospital. See infra notes 85-106
and accompanying text.




n5  This scenario could have been painted differently. Rather than having her
current privileges reviewed for renewal, the surgeon could have been attempting
to obtain privileges from the hospital for the first time. The same medical
staff could have reviewed her and decided that, although there is no question as
to the quality of care this physician would provide, she might not be the most
profitable physician for the hospital.




n6  See Morreim, supra note 1, at 275.




n7  John D. Blum, Hospital-Medical Staff Relations in The Face of Shifting
Institutional Business Strategies: A Legal Analysis, 14 PUGET SOUND L. REV. 561,
561 (1991).




n8  Morreim, supra note 1, at 275.




n9  See ROSEMARY STEVENS, IN SICKNESS AND IN WEALTH: AMERICAN HOSPITALS IN THE
TWENTIETH CENTURY 17 (1989) (noting that the hospitals of today grew out of
public and private welfare institutions for the poor of the nineteenth century).




n10  Darling v. Charleston Community Memorial Hosp., 211 N.E.2d 253, 258 (Ill.
1965), cert. denied, 383 U.S. 946 (1966) (holding that a hospital may be held
independently liable for negligently failing to monitor the quality and
competence of the physicians on its staff).




n11  See, e.g., Jay Greene, Hospitals Eyeing Physicians' Practice Patterns:
Economic Credentialing Is Being Tested To Reduce Expenses And Improve Quality,
MODERN HEALTHCARE, Apr. 29, 1991, at 30, 30 ("Some physicians and experts
contend economic credentialing can lead to poor patient care by limiting
services, reducing access to care and interfering with the physician-patient
relationship."); Mary T. Koska, Hospital CEOs Divided on Use of Economic
Credentialing of Physicians, HOSPITALS, Mar. 20, 1991, at 42, 42 (describing the
policy at Haverford Memorial Hospital in which the hospital has "no qualms about
completely terminating [the physician's] hospital privileges if his financial
performance failed to improve."); Howard L. Lang, M.D., Curb Economic
Credentialing, MODERN HEALTHCARE, Apr. 29, 1991, at 28, 28 ("To enable
physicians to continue to advocate in the patient's interest, subversion of
quality patient care to economic motivations must be stopped."); Commentary,
Credentialing is a Fact of Life, MODERN HEALTHCARE, June 17, 1991, at 36, 36 ("
Economic credentialing is a fact of life, and it will serve in the future to
bond more closely the physician and the hospital.").




n12  As of the date of this writing, only one court in the country has ruled
explicitly on economic credentialing. See Rosenblum v. Tallahassee Memorial
Regional Med. Ctr., No. 91-589 (Cir. Ct. Leon County, Fla. filed June 22, 1992)
(holding the denial of privileges to a physician based solely on economic
considerations is valid based on an interpretation of a Florida statute). This
case is of limited value, however, as the physician was planning to appeal the
decision but never did because the hospital eventually granted him privileges.




n13  STEVENS, supra note 9, at 241 (identifying the three primary power
structures within the hospital and noting the current difficulty in drawing
lines between a hospital's business and medical functions); Blum, supra note 7,
at 563. However, in spite of the recent economic changes that have forced
hospitals to be more concerned with business issues, the basic structure of the
hospital remains unchanged. Id.




n14  John J. Miles & Mary S. Philp, Hospitals Caught in the Antitrust Net: An
Overview, 24 DUQ. L. REV. 489, 501 (1985). For a more detailed list of the
duties of the hospital administrator, see JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 2, at 41-44.




n15  Thaddeus J. Nodzenski, Where Is The Quality in The Health Care Quality
Improvement Act of 1986?, 22 LOY. U. CHI. L.J. 361, 380 (1991). Hospital
administrators are barred from admitting patients or providing other patient
services without prior physician consent.  Id. at 379. Furthermore, while the
hospital bylaws delegate some authority to the hospital administration, it is
not authorized to supervise the manner in which physicians treat their patients.
Id. at 380.




n16  John D. Blum, Economic Credentialing: A New Twist In Hospital Appraisal
Processes, 12 J. LEGAL MED. 427, 459 (1991).




n17  STEVENS, supra note 9, at 244-45 (emphasizing that, although boards of
trustees have the legal right to dictate medical policy, they usually defer to
others).




n18  Id. (recognizing that decisions about new members of the medical staff are
normally based upon the recommendations of medical staff committees).




n19  Miles & Philp, supra note 14, at 501-02 (discussing hospital organization
and staff credentialing). See also JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 2, at 53 ("All
[medical staff] members have delineated clinical privileges that allow them to
provide patient care services independently within the scope of their clinical
privileges.").




n20  Miles & Philp, supra note 14, at 501. For a more detailed list of the
duties and responsibilities of the medical staff, see the JCAHO MANUAL, supra
note 2, at 53-73.




n21  Miles & Philp, supra note 14, at 501.




n22  See JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 2.




n23  Nodzenski, supra note 15, at 378 (discussing access to hospital resources
as essential to physician's ability to practice medicine).




n24  See JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 2.




n25  Id. at 53.




n26  Id.




n27  Miles & Philp, supra note 14, at 502.




n28  Since the granting or renewal of privileges are made for no more than two
years, a physician must have his/her current privileges reviewed every two years
to maintain them. JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 2, at 56.




n29  See STEVENS, supra note 9, at 244-45 (explaining that decisions about new
members of medical staff normally are based upon the recommendations of medical
staff committees).




n30  For example, under California law the board is expressly given the final
credentialing authority. CAL. CODE REGS. tit. 22, section 70701(a)(1)(A)-(F)
(1991). Furthermore, Illinois state law charges the board with the
responsibility for the hospital organization, management, control, operations,
and appointment of the medical staff. ILL. ANN. STAT. ch. 210, para. 85/10
(Smith-Hurd 1990).




n31  Most courts have held the governing board responsible "to evaluate,
counsel, and if necessary take action to prevent unreasonable risk of harm by
physicians to patients treated in their facilities." James F. Blumstein & Frank
A. Sloan, Antitrust and Hospital Peer Review, 51 LAW & CONTEMP. PROBS., Spring
1988, at 7, 17. The idea that hospitals are responsible for the quality of care
provided under their roof is known as hospital corporate liability.  Darling v.
Charleston Community Memorial Hosp., 211 N.E.2d 253 (Ill. 1965), cert. denied,
383 U.S. 946 (1966). This liability imposes a legal duty upon the hospital to
engage in the effective credentialing of its physicians. Blum, supra note 16, at
461. The role of the governing board has also been characterized as that of a
fiduciary of the public. Id. See also Desai v. St. Barnabas Med. Ctr., 510 A.2d
662, 668 (N.J. 1986) (stating that hospital powers that relate to the quality of
care must be exercised reasonably for the public good and must serve public
health objectives).




n32  Under the JCAHO standards, the authority to make the final credentialing
decision rests with the board. JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 2, at 26. The board must
act in a timely manner to the recommendations of the medical staff. Id. If there
is a dispute between the board and the medical staff, JCAHO standards require a
joint conference to resolve the issue in a timely manner. Id. The JCAHO
standards are implemented in medical staff bylaws which are binding on the
hospital. Id. at 58. For further explanation of the functions of JCAHO, see
infra notes 41-43, 71-78 and accompanying text.




n33  Blumstein & Sloan, supra note 31, at 10.




n34  See STEVENS, supra note 9, at 17-51 (discussing the public's initial
resistance to hospitalization and how wealthy patients were attracted by
offering luxurious amenities in the early twentieth century).




n35  Id. at 34 (linking an increase in physicians interest in hospitals to the
general acceptance of the germ theory).




n36  Blum, supra note 16, at 431.




n37  By the 1920's, the ACS had emerged as a private organization which
attempted to establish voluntary ethics standards for hospitals. STEVENS, supra
note 9, at 114. If a hospital conformed to the ACS standards it was certified;
this was similar to a "Good Housekeeping Seal of Approval," in that it assured
consumers that they could expect a certain level of quality and standardization.
Id.




n38  Id. at 114-15 (after inspecting hospitals with over 100 beds, the ACS found
that less than one-seventh met its minimal standards).




n39  Id. at 114 (organizing the doctors into a medical staff facilitated the
implementation of the ACS standards).




n40  Blum, supra note 16, at 431-32.




n41  STEVENS, supra note 9, at 247. JCAH (now JCAHO) was a private,
not-forprofit organization that became the only organization concerned with
hospital standardization. Id. There is no clear history of the establishment of
JCAH. Id. at 247 n.49. Like the ACS, compliance with JCAH's regulations was
voluntary. Id. at 248. Although this accreditation system was (and still is)
voluntary, it was a stable system that became an accepted bureaucratic process.
Id.




n42  Id. (creating and then revising hospital bylaws, JCAH modified the peer
review process relating to the granting and withdrawing of privileges);
Blumstein & Sloan, supra note 31, at 10. JCAHO accreditation is important to
hospitals because several states mandate it, and under certain circumstances,
accredited hospitals may be automatically eligible for Medicare reimbursements.
Id. at 11. Since accreditation is so important to hospitals, the JCAHO standards
for medical staff review are taken very seriously. Id.




n43  Timothy S. Jost, The Joint Commission on Accreditation of Hospitals:
Private Regulation of Health Care And The Public Interest, 24 B.C. L. REV. 835,
872-74 (1983).




n44  Blumstein & Sloan, supra note 31, at 12.




n45  Id. at 13.




n46  See id. at 12-13 (reviewing the battle between quality assurance of care
versus the conflict of interest with cost).




n47  Darling v. Charleston Community Memorial Hosp., 211 N.E.2d 253, 257 (Ill.
1965) cert. denied, 383 U.S. 946 (1966) (quoting Bing v. Thunig, 143 N.E.2d 3, 8
(N.Y. 1957)).




n48  211 N.E.2d 253 (Ill. 1965), cert. denied, 383 U.S. 946 (1966).




n49  Id. at 258.




n50  Id. at 257 (quoting Bing, 143 N.E.2d at 8).




n51  301 N.W.2d 156 (Wis. 1981) (asserting duty of hospital to exercise
reasonable care in medical staff privileging and selection).




n52  Id. at 174.




n53  Id. (stressing that the credentialing committee does not relieve the
hospital of its duty to evaluate, monitor and admit only competent physicians).




n54  Although not all state courts have held hospitals corporately liable for
implementing the peer review process, the trend is sufficiently strong and
sufficient to lead one to conclude that under common law such peer reviews are
legally mandated. See, e.g., Bell v. Sharp Cabrillo Hosp., 260 Cal. Rptr. 886,
897 (Cal. Ct. App. 1989) (holding that a hospital is negligent if it doesn't
exercise reasonable care in selecting and reviewing the competency of its staff
physicians); Elam v. College Park Hosp., 183 Cal. Rptr. 156, 165 (Cal. Ct. App.
1982) (holding a hospital corporately liable for insuring the competency of its
medical staff); Insinga v. LaBella, 543 So. 2d 209, 214 (Fla. 1989) (holding
that the doctrine of corporate negligence imposes a duty upon a hospital to
select and retain competent physicians through the issuance of staff
privileges); Pedroza v. Bryant, 677 P.2d 166, 170 (Wash. 1984) (holding the
doctrine of corporate liability applicable to impose a duty on a hospital to
grant privileges only to competent physicians).




n55  42 U.S.C. sections 11101-11152 (1988).




n56  42 U.S.C. sections 11111-11115.




n57  42 U.S.C. sections 11131-11137.




n58  See 42 U.S.C. section 11101. ("The increasing occurrence of medical
malpractice and the need to improve the quality of medical care . . . can be
remedied through effective professional peer review."). See also Charity Scott,
Medical Peer Review, Antitrust, and the Effect of Statutory Reform, 50 MD. L.
REV. 316, 323 n.24 (1991) ("limiting the potential legal liability of
peer-review participants will result in more candid deliberation and effective
outcomes and improved quality of medical care").




n59  Scott, supra note 58, at 329 n.54 ("It is likely that the [peer review]
process will be abused for anticompetitive or antisocial purposes . . . .").




n60  See, e.g., Miles & Philp, supra note 14, at 505 ("Ways must be sought to
weed out meritless cases early on, but without doing injustice to appropriate
principles of antitrust jurisprudence.").




n61  But see Scott, supra note 58, at 321-22 ("The statutory reform effected by
the Act falls short of that heralded by its supporters, and . . . because the
Act does not change the substantive rules governing antitrust liability in peer
review cases, its much-touted 'immunity' is more imaginary than real.").




n62  See 42 U.S.C. section 11111(a) (1988) (stating that anyone involved in the
peer review process "shall not be liable in damages under the law of the United
States or of any State . . . with respect to the action" so long as it meets the
good faith standards of section 11112(a)). See also Decker v. IHC Hosps., Inc.,
982 F.2d 433, 436 (10th Cir. 1992) (concluding that the "HCQIA establishes
immunity from liability" only, not immunity from the suit); Austin v. McNamara,
979 F.2d 728, 737 (9th Cir. 1991) (holding that the HCQIA immunized the hospital
and its physicians from antitrust liability for suspending a neurosurgeon's
privileges because the peer review was based on quality concerns); Smith v.
Ricks, 798 F. Supp. 605, 610 (N.D. Cal. 1992) ("In order to prove that the
review actions . . . were taken in the reasonable belief that they were in
furtherance of quality health care, Defendants must show that 'with the
information available to them at the time of the professional review action,
Defendants would reasonably have concluded that their action would restrict
incompetent behavior or would protect patients.' " (quoting Austin v. McNamara,
731 F. Supp. 934, 940 (C.D. Cal. 1990))); Fobbs v. Holy Cross Health Sys. Corp.,
789 F. Supp. 1054, 1065 (E.D. Cal. 1992) ("The HCQIA provides immunity for
discrete professional review actions/decisions which meet particular standards,
i.e., reasonable belief that the action furthered quality health care . . . .");
Scott, supra note 58, at 331 & n.62 (the immunity provisions of the Act were
redrafted "to protect physicians who participate in a good-faith effort to weed
out their incompetent colleagues . . . .").




n63  42 U.S.C. section 11151(9) (1988).




n64  42 U.S.C. section 11151(9)(E).




n65  In order to be protected, the peer review must be:

    (1) in the reasonable belief that the action was in the furtherance of
quality health care, (2) after a reasonable effort to obtain the facts of the
matter, (3) after adequate notice and hearing procedures are afforded . . ., and
(4) in the reasonable belief that the action was warranted by the facts known .
. . . A professional review action shall be presumed to have met the preceding
standards necessary for the protection set out in Section 11111(a) of this title
unless the presumption is rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence.

    42 U.S.C section 11112(a) (1988).




n66  See, e.g., CONN. GEN. STAT. ANN. section 19a-17b (West Supp. 1993); FLA.
STAT. ANN. section 395.0193 (West 1993); GA. CODE ANN. section 31-7-15 (Michie
1992); HAW. REV. STAT. section 624-25.5 (1993); MASS. GEN. LAWS ANN. ch. 11
section 203 (West 1993); MO. ANN. STAT. section 537.035 (Vernon 1988); OR. REV.
STAT. section 441.055 (1991); TX. CIV. STAT. ANN. art. 4495b (West 1994).




n67  See, e.g., MASS. GEN. LAWS ANN. ch. 111 section 203(a) (West 1993) ("The
by-laws of every licensed hospital and the by-laws of all medical staffs shall
contain provisions for reporting conduct by a health care provider that
indicates incompetency in his specialty or conduct that might be inconsistent
with or harmful to good patient care or safety."); MO. ANN. STAT. section
537.035(1)-(2) (Vernon 1988) (the responsibility of the peer review committee is
responsible "to evaluate, maintain, or monitor the quality and utilization of
health care services or to exercise any combination of such responsibilities.");
OR. REV. STAT. section 441.055 (3)(d) (1991) ("The governing body shall: insure
that physicians admitted to practice in the facility are organized into a
medical staff in such a manner as to effectively review the professional
practices of the facility for the purposes of reducing morbidity and mortality
and for the improvement of patient care.").




n68  ILL. ANN. STAT. ch. 210, para. 85/10.4 (Smith-Hurd 1993) (providing that,
prior to renewing a staff member's privileges, a hospital must request
information from the state concerning the staff member's licensure status and
any disciplinary action taken against the staff member).




n69  See FLA. STAT. ANN. section 395.0193 (3)(a)-(g) (West 1993) (requiring that
the peer review committee find incompetence, habitual drug use, mental or
physical impairment, medical malpractice, large malpractice settlements, or
failure to follow hospital procedures, before altering a physician's
privileges); GA. CODE ANN. section 31-7-15 (a)(1)-(3) (Michie 1992) (requiring
peer reviews to include the "quality of the care provided," review of
"diagnostic and surgical procedures," and the physician's "qualifications and
professional competence"); TX. REV. CIV. STAT. ANN. art. 4495b section
103(9)(A)-(E) (West 1994) (requiring the peer review committee to evaluate "the
qualifications of professional health care practitioners," specifically
including evaluation of "accuracy of diagnosis," "quality of the care rendered,"
"reports made to a medical peer review committee," and "reports made by a
medical peer review committee to others").




n70  MD. CODE ANN. HEALTH-GEN. section 19-319(e)(1) & (2)(i) (1990).
Furthermore, Maryland specifically requires that the reappointment process is to
be done every two years to review the physician's pattern of performance,
utilization, quality and risk data. Id. at section 19-319(e)(2)(ii) & (iii).




n71  See JCAHO MANUAL, supra note 2.




n72 " The governing body is responsible for the final decision, based on medical
staff recommendations, regarding an individual's appointment or reappointment to
the medical staff and granting of initial or renewed/revised clinical
privileges." Id. at 56. For the complete list of regulations relating to the
medical staff's responsibilities, see id. at 53-73.




n73 " The medical staff develops and adopts bylaws and rules and regulations to
establish a framework for self-governance of medical staff activities and
accountability to the governing body." Id. at 58.




n74 " All its members have delineated clinical privileges that allow them to
provide patient care services independently within the scope of their clinical
privileges." Id. at 53.




n75 " Medical staff membership and delineated clinical privileges are granted by
the governing body, based on medical staff recommendations, in accordance with
the bylaws, rules and regulations, and policies of the medical staff and of the
hospital." Id.

    Although the guidelines allow factors such as geography of the applicant,
malpractice insurance coverage, and necessity of institutional resources to be
considered, JCAHO requires the medical staff to primarily focus on clinical
qualification. "The criteria are designed to assure the medical staff and
governing body that patients will receive quality care." Id. at 54. "The
criteria pertain to, at the least, evidence of current licensure, relevant
training and/or experience, current competence, and health status." Id. "Board
certification is an excellent benchmark and is considered when delineating
clinical privileges." Id. at 56.




n76 " Appointment or reappointment to the medical staff and the granting or
renewal/revision of clinical privileges are made for a period of not more than
two years." Id. at 56. These reviews require an evaluation of the physician's
"professional performance . . . judgment and . . . clinical and/or technical
skills . . . ." Id. at 55.




n77  For example, the federal government relies on JCAHO accreditation when
certifying hospitals to participate in the Medicare program. Jost, supra note
43, at 843. Furthermore, many states have included JCAHO accreditation decisions
into their programs for licensing hospitals. Id. at 844. Finally, some private
institutions, such as Blue Cross, have required JCAHO accreditation to
participate in their programs. Id. at 845.




n78  See STEVENS, supra note 9, at 248-49 (describing how JCAHO has provided the
framework for establishing hospital peer review procedures).




n79  See, e.g., CONN. GEN. STAT. ANN. section 19a-17b (a)(iv) (West Supp. 1993)
(declaring "medical review committee shall include . . . a committee of any
health care institution established pursuant to written bylaws . . . engaging in
peer review, to gather and review information relating to the care and treatment
of patients . . . ."); HAW. REV. STAT. section 624-25.5(a)(2) (1993) (function
of the peer review committee is "to maintain the professional standards
established by the bylaws of the society, hospital, or clinic of the persons
engaged in its . . . hospital or clinic"); OR. REV. STAT. section 441.055(4)(e)
(1991) ("The bylaws shall include . . . procedures for insuring that the
facility's procedures for granting, restricting and terminating privileges are
followed . . . .").




n80 " Each applicant for medical staff membership is oriented to these bylaws,
rules and regulations, and policies and agrees in writing that his/her
activities as a member of the medical staff will be bound by them." JCAHO
MANUAL, supra note 2, at 53. "Neither body [the medical staff nor the governing
board] may unilaterally amend the medical staff bylaws." Id. at 58.




n81  See Lang, supra note 11, at 28 ("The credentialing process, as performed by
the medical staff, ensures the training and competence of the practitioners on
the medical staff.").




n82  For example, issuing privileges to a physician who has a more profitable
patientmix, or who does not have privileges in any competing hospital, or whose
costs are lower so as to make more money for the hospital -- may occur
regardless of how competent the physician is. With economic credentialing, a
top-quality, competent physician may be denied privileges simply for not
bringing in as much money for the hospital as other physicians.




n83  See Jay Greene, System Pioneers Credentialing, MODERN HEALTHCARE, Apr. 29,
1991, at 32, 32 (discussing the policies of two hospitals that review physicians
solely on economic factors and tie that review to the credentialing decision).




n84  Lang, supra note 11, at 28. A similar, but distinctly different practice is
used by some hospitals that monitor physicians' practice patterns to pinpoint
inefficient uses of resources. Greene, supra note 11, at 30. This practice,
known as "Utilization Review (UR), is a cost containment effort and quality
assurance strategy implemented . . . to ensure that the services provided are
both necessary and cost-efficient." Cheralyn E. Schessler, Liability
Implications of Utilization Review as a Cost Containment Mechanism, 8 J.
CONTEMP. HEALTH L. & POL'Y 379, 380 (1992). See also Lang, supra note 11, at 28
("Utilization review seeks to avoid the provision of unnecessary services based
on quality considerations, including services provided without good cause when
less expensive alternatives would suffice as determined by professional
judgment."). Such programs are used in hospitals to reduce expenses while
improving the quality of care. Greene, supra note 11, at 30.

    The distinct difference between UR and economic credentialing is that UR is
a quality issue -- not an economic issue. Id. "Overutilization, underutilization
and inappropriate utilization do not represent good-quality care . . . ." Id.
Furthermore, UR is not attached to the credentialing and decredentialing of
physicians. Id. However, in one instance economic credentialing is directly tied
to the credentialing and decredentialing of physicians and is not related to
quality of care issues. Koska, supra note 11, at 42. Physicians are not worried
about the use of economic criteria that may flag quality problems; they are
concerned about economic criteria -- unrelated to quality -- being used in
privileging decisions. Id. at 46.




n85  David M. Frankford, The Complexity of Medicare's Hospital Reimbursement
System: Paradoxes of Averaging, 78 IOWA L. REV. 517, 572 (1993).




n86  Id.




n87  Fred Bayles & Daniel Q. Haney, Doctors Feel Pressure to Keep Their
Hospitals Financially Healthy, L.A. TIMES, Nov. 4, 1990, at 26. For example: a
patient is admitted with chest pains which the physician thinks it is a heart
condition. The physician runs a series of tests and x-rays and concludes it was
only indigestion. The tests and x-rays were costly to the hospital. With the DRG
system, the hospital will only receive one payment -the payment for treating
indigestion. Even though the hospital incurred more expenses in the actual
treatment, it still receives the one amount. Therefore, by minimizing expenses,
the hospital would be able to make a larger profit from each DRG payment.




n88  See id. at 26 ("DRGs encourage the hospital to keep their costs down, and
yet the physician controls what the hospital bill will be.").




n89  See Schessler, supra note 84, at 379 (stating part of the increase in
health care costs is due to the retrospective nature of physician reimbursement
and the practice of defensive medicine to avoid malpractice litigation).




n90  See E. Haavi Morreim, Cost Containment and the Standard of Medical Care, 75
CAL. L. REV. 1719, 1720 (1987) ("Thus insulated from the economic costs of their
decisions and inspired by the societal value that each patient should receive
the best health care available, physicians and other providers have had powerful
incentives to deliver all indicated care, and virtually no incentives to hold
back.").




n91  Green, supra note 83, at 32. Hospitals who have implemented such programs
do not hide the fact that this is strictly an economic plan for the hospital.
They believe it is within the "fiduciary responsibility of the board to make
sure doctors don't bankrupt the hospital." Id. In one situation, a physician was
offered $ 1.2 million to practice at a hospital based on his profitability to
the hospital -- not his quality of care or competence. See Steve Sternberg,
Doctor's Hospital Pact Sparks Federal Inquiry: Kennestone Deal Worth $ 1.2
Million, THE ATLANTA CONSTITUTION, Nov. 19, 1992, at 1.




n92  No. 91-589 (Cir. Ct. Leon County, Fla. filed June 22, 1992).




n93  TMRMC is a 771-bed private, not-for-profit hospital. Howard Larkin, Judge
Upholds Hospital's 'Economic Credentialing,' AM. MED. NEWS, June 29, 1992, at 5.




n94  TCH is a 180-bed private, not-for-profit hospital. Id.




n95  Id. (stating that running a unit at one hospital makes the doctor a
business liability at another hospital).




n96  Id. (the administrator of TMRMC admitted that Dr. Rosenblum's
qualifications as a surgeon were not an issue in making credentialing
decisions).




n97  TMRMC said that it denied Dr. Rosenbaum cardiac privileges in order to
protect their cardiac program, since Dr. Rosenblum appeared in advertisements
for TCH, might refer uninsured patients to TMRMC, and might recruit nurses from
TMRMC's cardiac program. Id. The court upheld the economic credentialing
decision based on an interpretation of the Florida statute which said "such
other elements" may be use in the credentialing process. Id. Rosenblum's
attorney argued that "the hospital seized on ambiguous language in the law . . .
and used it to write a blank check for economic credentialing." Id. Although Dr.
Rosenblum planned to appeal the decision, the case will not be appealed because
he has since been granted cardiac privileges at TMRMC and maintains privileges
at both hospitals. No Appeal in Economic Credentialing Lawsuit, MANAGED CARE LAW
OUTLOOK, Nov. 24, 1992, at 11, 11.




n98  This refers to the proportions of a physician's patients who are private
paying, public paying (Medicare & Medicaid), and charity work. For example, a
patient mix that is mostly Medicaid patients would be less profitable because of
its low reimbursement rates. See Joan Beck, The Numbers Don't Add Up In
Clinton's Health Care Package, CHI. TRIB., Sept. 16, 1993, at N25.




n99  Greene, supra note 11, at 30.




n100  See Lisa Colosi, Wilder v. Virginia Hospital Association: Making the
Medicaid Reimbursement Rate Challenge a Federal Case, 12 PACE L. REV. 139, 146
(1992) ("Health care providers nationwide are experiencing financial troubles as
a result of inadequate reimbursement rates by state Medicaid agencies.").




n101  See e.g., Sternberg, supra note 91, at A17 (noting that a "hospital
administrator will not look kindly on an obstetrician who has a largely Medicaid
practice . . . .").




n102  Koska, supra note 11, at 46.




n103  When a hospital decides which physician to court and which to abandon
based only on prospective revenue generations for the hospital, the hospital is
using economic credentialing. Since a physician's patient mix directly
corresponds to the generation of hospital revenue, a decision based on revenue
generated is essentially a decision based on patient mix. See, generally,
Sternberg, supra note 91.




n104  A recent national survey, by professor John Blum of Loyola University,
shows "that most hospitals use economic criteria when reviewing physicians for
medical privileges." Jay Greene, Economics Widely Used in Reviewing Doctors,
MODERN HEALTHCARE, Nov. 16, 1992, at 10, 10. This survey is part of an ongoing
study that is attempting to define the credentialing process and determine how
hospitals use credentialing as a disciplinary tool. Id.




n105  See, e.g., Proposed Changes in Bylaws Upset Hospital's Medical Staff,
MODERN HEALTHCARE, Aug. 10, 1992 at 18, 18 ("Dennis Cavanaugh, M.D., a
43-year-old surgeon, said he won't practice at Huron Regional because 'the
hospital is going in a direction I cannot go.' ").




n106  See, e.g., This Week in Healthcare: For The Record, MODERN HEALTHCARE,
October 19, 1992, at 14 (stating that the Medical Society of the State of New
York and the California Medical Association have both issued formal policies
opposing economic credentialing).




n107  Larry Reibstein & Mary Hager, Physicians Cut Their Costs: Hospitals Get
Tough -- But How Far Should They Go?, NEWSWEEK, Dec. 23, 1991 at 41.




n108  Id. (reviewing the battle between hospitals and doctors over economic
credentialing and its consequences).




n109  See Berman v. Valley Hosp., 510 A.2d 673, 677 (N.J. 1986) ("Nevertheless,
because its exercise implicates the public welfare, as well as individual
interests, this kind of managerial discretion is not unbounded.").




n110  See Desai v. St. Barnabas Med. Ctr., 510 A.2d 662, 671 (N.J. 1986)
(stating that a hospital decision "predicated upon exclusionary policies
fostering only the well-being of those staff members who are already admitted
[to the hospital staff] . . . must be invalidated").




n111  See, e.g., Greisman v. Newcomb Hosp., 192 A.2d 817, 825 (N.J. Sup. Ct.
1963) ("Hospital officials . . . must never lose sight of the fact that the
hospitals are operated not for private ends but for the benefit of the public .
. . ."); Belmar v. Cipolla, 475 A.2d 533, 538 (N.J. 1984) ("No matter what
arrangement a hospital may have with doctors, its primary purpose remains to
serve the public."); Doe v. Bridgeton Hosp. Ass'n, 366 A.2d 641, 646 (N.J.
1976), cert. denied, 433 U.S. 914 (1977) (stating that reasonable hospital
decisions should be respected as long as they are consistent with the public
interest); Berman, 510 A.2d at 676 ("[The hospital's] health care powers are
deeply impressed with a public interest." (quoting Desai, 510 A.2d at 668)).




n112  See Desai, 510 A.2d at 665 (recognizing that the concern for the public
interest is significant in determining the reasonableness of hospital
decisions).




n113  255 Cal. Rptr. 806 (Cal. Ct. App. 1989).




n114  Id. at 810-11 (agreeing with the trial court's attachment of "great
importance to the public policy considerations involved, the societal, public
interest in the best possible medical care").




n115  Id. at 810.




n116  510 A.2d 662 (N.J. 1986).




n117  Id. at 664.




n118  Id. at 664 & n.1.




n119  Id. at 668. Public health objectives include patient's needs, a reasonable
opportunity to select physicians, and adequate access to hospital facilities.
Id.




n120  Id. at 671-72. The court stated that this exception not only discriminated
against physicians, it also limited access of health care to the patients.  Id.
at 670. See also Greisman v. Newcomb Hosp., 192 A.2d 817, 820 (N.J. Sup. Ct.
1963) (concluding that a hospital's policy which restricted a patient's ability
to select the desired physician-hospital combination was not acting reasonably
for the public good).




n121  Id. at 825.




n122  Id.




n123  See, e.g., Berman v. Valley Hosp., 510 A.2d 673, 676 (N.J. 1986) ("In
determining the validity of a managerial decision made by a hospital, courts
understand that the major concern is whether the public interest in health care
is reasonably and rationally advanced by the hospital's decision.").




n124  In Berman, the New Jersey Supreme Court stated that the reasonableness of
a hospital's physician credentialing policy will be reviewed by "considering the
nature and adequacy of the information that has been advanced in its support"
because such a policy "implicates the public welfare." Id. at 677. The court
further explained that "a hospital decision of this character will be viewed
favorably if it is reached in the normal and regular course of conducting the
affairs of the hospital, and is based on adequate information, regardless of
form, origin, or authorship, that is generally considered reasonable and
reliable by professional persons responsibly involved in the health care field."
Id. (quoting Desai v. St. Barnabas Med. Ctr., 510 A.2d 662, 669 (N.J. 1986)).




n125  Id. at 677. In Berman, the health care objective was reducing and
controlling hospital overcrowding and excessive patient-bed occupancy. Id. The
court stated that the evidence did not demonstrate that the hospital's
credentialing policy sufficiently related to that health care objective.  Id. at
680.




n126  Id. at 680. The court went on to say that it expected the plaintiffs to be
granted full staff privileges, absent any valid grounds for denial. Id.




n127  Id.




n128  Lang, supra note 11, at 28.




n129  See supra notes 92-97 and accompanying text. For instance, an emergency
room surgeon on duty decided that his emergency room would be overwhelmed by
attempting to care for all the victims of a car wreck. Bayles & Haney, supra
note 87, at 26. He ordered the ambulances to take the victims to three other
hospitals, aside from his own, so they would receive care more quickly; however,
since less victims were treated at his hospital the result was less business for
the hospital. Id. The hospital told him never to do that again. Id. See also id.
(keeping hospital costs down may require patients to be treated in a
non-individualized manner); Sternberg, supra note 91, at A17 (in which a
hospital attempted to jettison the chief of the pulmonary department -- who
netted the hospital less revenue -- in order to recruit a physician who later
became one of the hospital's "Top Five revenue generators").




n130  See supra notes 98-103 and accompanying text.




n131  See Greene, supra note 11, at 30 ("Economic credentialing can lead to poor
patient care by limiting services, reducing access to care and interfering with
the physicianpatient relationship.").




n132  See Desai v. St. Barnabus Med. Ctr., 510 A.2d 662, 666 (N.J. 1986) ("In
determining that the hospital's actions were not exercised reasonably for the
public good, the Court emphasized that the hospital's policy restricted the
patient's ability to select the desired doctor-hospital combination. (citing
Geisman v. Newcomb Hosp., 192 A.2d 817 (N.J. 1963)).




n133  See supra notes 113-115 and accompanying text.




n134  See supra notes 55-65 and accompanying text.




n135  See supra notes 55-65 and accompanying text.




n136  Scott, supra note 58, at 331 n.62.




n137  This public health care objective arises from Congress' intent under HCQIA
to encourage good-faith peer review in order to rid hospitals of incompetent
physicians. See supra notes 55-65 and accompanying text.




n138  See supra notes 85-91 and accompanying text.




n139  See supra notes 85-91 and accompanying text.




n140  See Reibstein & Hager, supra note 107, at 41 (noting that some doctors
fear that economic credentialing will lead to lack of health care for the
elderly and indigent).




n141  For example, the extra test may reveal an unforeseen problem. This test,
therefore, enhances the quality of care provided while eliminating any
malpractice suits.




n142  See Schessler, supra note 84, at 381 (stating that the current rise in
health care costs is in part due to an increase in malpractice liability).




n143  Berman v. Valley Hosp., 510 A.2d 673, 677 (N.J. 1986).




n144  See supra notes 111-26 and accompanying text.




n145  See supra note 79 and accompanying text.




n146  Blum, supra note 16, at 438.




n147  See, e.g., Miller v. Indian Hosp., 419 A.2d 1191, 1193 (Pa. Super. Ct.
1980) (hospital bylaws are binding contracts between a health care provider and
the hospital); Bhatnagar v. Mid-Maine Med. Ctr., 510 A.2d 233, 234 (Me. 1986)
(stating that hospital bylaws "constitute an enforceable contract between [the
physician] and [the hospital]").




n148  408 N.E.2d 981 (Ill. App. 1980).




n149  Id. at 984 (quoting Jain v. Northwest Community Hosp., 385 N.E.2d 108, 112
(Ill. App. 1978)).




n150  No. 88-311- II, 1989 WL 134739 (Tenn. App. Nov. 8, 1989), rev'd in part on
other grounds, Lewisburg Community Hosp. v. Alfredson, 805 S.W.2d 756 (Tenn.
1991).




n151  Id. at 7 (citing Pariser v. Christian Health Care Sys., Inc., 816 F.2d
1248, 1251 (8th Cir. 1987); Adler v. Montefiore Hosp. Ass'n, 311 A.2d 634, 645
(Pa. 1973), cert. denied, 411 U.S. 1131 (1974)).




n152  See Balkissoon v. Capitol Hill Hosp., 558 A.2d 304, 308 (App. D.C. 1989)
("The Hospital's obligation to follow its bylaws does not arise only from a
contractual relationship with [the physician] . . . the public has a substantial
interest . . . ."). In Balkissoon, the court decided that the hospital was
obligated to follow its bylaws due to the public's interest in effectively
operated hospitals. Id. The court believed that the public had an interest in
seeing that hospitals follow their bylaws and do not act arbitrarily: "Thus,
while sharing the interest of hospitals that only qualified doctors be given
staff privileges, the public also has an interest in assuring that staff
decisions are not made arbitrarily. A hospital's failure to comply with material
procedures delineated in its bylaws is inherently arbitrary." Id.




n153  See supra notes 2, 80 and accompanying text.




n154  See supra notes 33-43 and accompanying text.




n155  Lang, supra note 11, at 28.




n156  See supra notes 88-91 and accompanying text (focusing on physicians'
disincentive to hold back on health care).




n157  See Greene, supra note 11 at 30. This is because these phrases commonly
are written to add to quality and competency factors already required in the
credentialing decision. For example: "Physicians will be reviewed on quality and
competency criteria and any other relevant factors," the "and" implies "in
addition to" -- still not allowing economic credentialing. If the bylaws read:
"quality and competency criteria or economic criteria," the "or" would imply the
ability to use exclusively economic criteria.




n158  See Greene, supra note 11 (discussing the differences between utilization
review and economic credentialing).




n159  Blumstein & Sloan, supra note 31, at 39 & n.222.




n160  Scott, supra note 58, at 332.




n161  See Scott, supra note 58, at 335 ("This sentiment is perhaps founded on a
lurking judicial suspicion that many, if not most, such cases are illegitimate .
. . ."); Blumstein & Sloan, supra note 31, at 37 ("As plaintiffs have sought to
have antitrust doctrine applied to hospital peer-review activity, it has become
clear that courts have, in general, been very wary of what they perceive to be a
questionable, if not illicit, relationship.").




n162  Scott, supra note 58, at 336. See, e.g., Patrick v. Burget, 486 U.S. 94
(1988), reh'g denied, 487 U.S. 1243 (1988) (holding that the medical staff
violated sections 1 and 2 of the Sherman Act by participating in peer reviews in
order to reduce competition); Oltz v. St. Peter's Community Hosp., 861 F.2d 1440
(9th Cir. 1988) (finding that a nurse was harmed by conspiracy of anesthesia
service providers that was designed to eliminate competition).




n163  Section 1 states:

    Every contract, combination in the form of trust or otherwise, or
conspiracy, in restraint of trade or commerce among the several States, or with
foreign nations, is declared to be illegal. Every person who shall make any
contract or engage in any combination or conspiracy hereby declared to be
illegal shall be deemed guilty of a felony, and, on conviction thereof, shall be
punished by fine not exceeding $ 10,000,000 if a corporation, or, if any other
person, $ 350,000, or by imprisonment not exceeding three years, or by both said
punishments, in the discretion of the court.

    15 U.S.C.S. section 1 (Law. Co-op. 1994).




n164  Id. Section 1 does not apply to independent action. "An economic entity
'generally has a right to deal, or refuse to deal, with whomever it likes, as
long as it does so independently.' " Blumstein & Sloan, supra note 31, at 25
(quoting Monsanto Co. v. Spray-Rite Serv. Corp, 465 U.S. 752, 761 (1984)).




n165  Blumstein & Sloan, supra note 31, at 25. See also Scott, supra note 58, at
336 ("The denial or termination of medical staff privileges necessarily has the
effect of eliminating a competitor and thus . . . raises antitrust concerns.").




n166  See McLain v. Real Estate Bd., 444 U.S. 232, 242 (1980).




n167  Blumstein & Sloan, supra note 31, at 25 n.85 (citing McLain v. Real Estate
Bd., 444 U.S. 232, 241 (1980)).




n168  McLain, 444 U.S. at 242.




n169  111 S. Ct. 1842 (1991).




n170  Id. at 1844.




n171  Id.




n172  Id. at 1847.




n173  Id. at 1849. The Court stated that although only one physician was
excluded, there was still federal jurisdiction:

    Because the essence of any violation of section 1 is the illegal agreement
itself -rather than the overt acts performed in furtherance of it -- proper
analysis focuses, not upon actual consequences, but rather upon the potential
harm that would ensue if the conspiracy were successful . . . . Thus, respondent
need not allege, or prove, an actual effect on interstate commerce to support
federal jurisdiction.

    Id. at 1847-48.




n174  See Gale T. Miller, Antitrust Developments in 1990-91: U.S. Supreme Court
Decisions, 21 COLO. LAW. 235 (1992) ("The U.S. Supreme Court's decision [in
Pinhas] . . . makes it difficult to envision many health care cases that could
not be reached by the federal antitrust laws."); Diane Ruder, Antitrust and the
Credentialing and Decredentialing of Physicians, 19 N. KY. L. REV. 351, 353
(1992) (after Pinhas, "the common disputes over denial of hospital staff
privileges have become issues with a federal forum"); Einer Elhauge, Making
Sense of Antitrust Petitioning Immunity, 80 CAL. L. REV. 1177, 1196 n.105 (1992)
(stating that "because the interstate commerce requirement is so weak, as a
practical matter it excludes very few restraints").




n175  See Copperweld Corp. v. Independence Tube Corp., 467 U.S. 752, 768 (1984)
(holding that, in order to find a section 1 violation, there must be concerted
activity).




n176  Id. at 770-71.




n177  745 F.2d 786, 816 (3d Cir. 1984) (holding that "a single entity made up of
independent competing economic entities satisfies the joint action requirement
of Sherman Act Section 1").




n178  Id. at 815.




n179  Id. at 816.




n180  See, e.g., Oksanen v. Page Memorial Hosp., 945 F.2d 696, 706 (4th Cir.
1991) ("When these actors [the physicians of the medical staff] join together to
take action among themselves, they are unlike a single entity and therefore they
have the capacity to conspire as a matter of law.").




n181  Id. at 708.




n182  See Northwest Wholesale Stationers, Inc. v. Pacific Stationery & Printing,
Co., 472 U.S. 284, 289 (1985) (stating that, although the "decision of the
cooperative members to expel Pacific was certainly a restraint of trade in the
sense that every commercial agreement restrains trade . . . , whether this
action violates section 1 of the Sherman Act depends on whether it is adjudged
an unreasonable restraint.").




n183  Oksanen, 945 F.2d at 708.




n184  Northern Pac. Ry. Co. v. United States, 356 U.S. 1, 5 (1958).




n185  Oltz v. St. Peter's Community Hosp., 861 F.2d 1440, 1445 & n.1. (9th Cir.
1988) (examples of such agreements are boycotts, concerted refusals to deal and
price fixing).




n186  Blumstein & Sloan, supra note 31, at 54. See, e.g., FTC v. Indiana Fed'n
of Dentists, 476 U.S. 447, 458 (1986) ("Although this Court has in the past
stated that group boycotts are unlawful per se . . . the category of restraints
classed as group boycotts is not to be expanded indiscriminately, and the per se
approach has generally been limited . . . ."); Jefferson Parish Hosp. Dist. No.
2 v. Hyde, 466 U.S. 2, 9-14 (1984) (holding that, although tying arrangements
were traditionally deemed per se illegal, they are only per se illegal if the
seller has the ability "to force a purchaser to do something that he would not
do in a competitive market").




n187  Indiana Fed'n of Dentists, 476 U.S. at 458.




n188  Id. (quoting Chicago Bd. of Trade v. United States, 246 U.S. 231, 238
(1918)).




n189  National Soc'y of Professional Eng'rs v. United States, 435 U.S. 679, 692
(1978).




n190  Davis-Watkins Co. v. Service Merchandise, 686 F.2d 1190, 1195 (6th Cir.
1982), cert. denied, 466 U.S. 931 (1984). Commodities that are reasonably
interchangeable by consumers for the same purposes are considered within the
relevant product.  United States v. Du Pont, 351 U.S. 377, 395 (1956). The area
in which a potential buyer rationally may look for the goods and services he
seeks is considered within the relevant geographical area.  United States v.
Grinnell Corp., 384 U.S. 563, 570-71 (1966).




n191  Peter M. Gerhart, The Supreme Court and Antitrust Analysis: The (Near)
Triumph of the Chicago School, in THE SUPREME COURT REVIEW 319, 322 (Philip B.
Kurland et al. eds., 1982).




n192  Id.




n193  Peer reviews hardly can be seen as inherently anticompetitive in and of
themselves as they are mandated by JCAHO, hospital bylaws, state statutes and
protected by the HCQIA to further quality and competence concerns. See supra
notes 47-80 and accompanying text.




n194  Gerhart, supra note 191, at 322 (citing Standard Oil Co. v. United States,
221 U.S. 1 (1911)).




n195  Courts have applied such an analysis to challenges of peer review
decisions. See Oksanen v. Page Memorial Hosp., 945 F.2d 696, 708-09 (4th Cir.
1991) (where the court used the rule of reason approach to evaluate a
physician's section 1 claim against the medical staff for revoking his
privileges).




n196  If the peer review decision has legitimate procompetitive value, it will
not be considered an antitrust violation. See Health Care Lawyers Probe
Antitrust Law Developments, 58 ANTITRUST AND TRADE REGULATION REPORT, Feb. 22,
1990, at 268 (including the following procompetitive reasons: inadequate skill,
experience, failure to carry malpractice insurance, disruptive personality and
unwillingness to take staff member responsibilities). Furthermore, the peer
review may be immune from antitrust litigation. See infra notes 205-14 and
accompanying text.




n197  See supra note 162.




n198  486 U.S. 94 (1988).




n199  Id. at 96-98.




n200  Id. at 95.




n201  Id. at 96.




n202  Id.




n203  Id. at 97.




n204  A similar finding occurred in Oltz v. St. Peter's Community Hosp., 861
F.2d 1440 (9th Cir. 1988). In Oltz, a nurse anesthetist was terminated following
an exclusive staff agreement between the hospital and the anesthesiologists.
Id. at 1443. Oltz sued the hospital and anesthesiologists for antitrust
violations.  Id. at 1444. On appeal, the hospital argued that there was no
injury to competition because the lower court improperly defined the relevant
market.  Id. at 1445. However, the Ninth Circuit determined that it was
"inescapable" to find that the one-hospital town was the relevant market for
finding antitrust injury.  Id. at 1446-47.




n205  The state-action doctrine, also known as the Parker defense, arose out of
the Supreme Court case Parker v. Brown, 317 U.S. 341 (1943). The Court held that
the Sherman Act did not intend "to restrain state action or official action
directed by a state." Id. at 351. This rationale subsequently was applied to
private parties whose challenged restraint was "clearly articulated as state
policy" and must be "actively supervised by the State itself." Patrick v.
Burget, 486 U.S. 94, 100 (1988).




n206  Patrick, 486 U.S. at 105.




n207  Id.




n208  Id. at 105-06.




n209  42 U.S.C. sections 11111-11115 (1988). The immunity is only from damages
in an antitrust suit. Id. at section 11111(a)(1) The immunity does not apply to
a suit for injunctive relief. See Scott, supra note 58, at 323 n.24, 332 n.69.




n210  Scott, supra note 58, at 321. See also id. at 330 (stating that "examples
of abuse of the peer review process include adverse peer review decisions made,
not because of any incompetence or misconduct on the physicians' part, but
because of their race or origin or the race or origin of their patients; because
the physicians served poor, uninsured, or underinsured patients; because they
posed an economic threat to other physicians; because of some other 'turf
battle' among medical specialists; or because they blew the whistle on other
colleagues who were incompetent.").




n211  42 U.S.C. section 11151(9) (1988).




n212  Id. at section11151(9)(A)-(D).




n213  Id. at section 11151(9)(E).




n214  Scott, supra note 58, at 318. See also H.R. REP. NO. 903, 99th Cong., 2d
Sess. (1986) (a favorable report by Mr. Dingel submitted to the Committee on
Energy and Commerce concerning H.R. 5540, 99th Cong., 2d Sess. (1986) which
sought to encourage physician peer review).




n215  This is assuming the physician could prove that a conspiracy existed.
Economic criteria will not make this part of the analysis any stronger, it only
strengthens the unreasonableness of the restraint.




n216  Scott, supra note 58, at 330 & n.55-60.




n217  Id. at 318.




n218  If the economic criteria were evidence of some quality concern, this would
be a legitimate use of the peer review process. See supra note 84 (discussing
utilization review).




n219  See supra notes 169-74 and accompanying text.




n220  See supra notes 175-80 and accompanying text.




n221  See supra note 204 and accompanying text.




n222  Courts have held that peer review itself can be viewed as pro-competitive.
See, e.g., Marin v. Citizens Memorial Hosp., 700 F. Supp. 354, 361 (S.D Tex.
1988) ("restricting staff privileges to doctors who maintain a basic level of
medical competency is ultimately pro-competitive not anti-competitive"); Quinn
v. Kent Gen. Hosp., 617 F. Supp. 1226, 1239 (D.C. Del. 1985) ("Peer review
process is arguably pro-competitive, for by monitoring the qualifications and
performance of physicians it may compensate for the relative lack of information
about these matters by consumers."). These cases illustrate that where peer
review is used to promote quality of care concerns, it will be considered
pro-competitive. Therefore, by excluding quality concerns and focusing solely on
economic criteria, the pro-competitive value noted by these courts arguably is
lost.




n223  National Soc'y of Professional Eng'rs v. United States, 435 U.S. 679, 692
(1978).




n224  Economic credentialing is not necessarily anticompetitive in every
instance. If that were the case, it would be possible to consider economic
credentialing as being inherently anticompetitive and a per se violation.
However, since it may be possible that economic credentialing may occur while
not being anticompetitive, the sole use of economic criteria in the peer review
process should provide additional support to an existing claim of an antitrust
violation.


